Washington statutes.
RCW 8.12.510

Reassessment.

If any assessment be annulled or set aside by any court, or be invalid for any cause, a new assessment may be made, and return and like notice given and proceedings had as herein required in relation to the first; and all parties in interest shall have the like rights, and the city council or other legislative body, and the superior court, shall perform the like duties and have like power in relation to any subsequent assessment as are hereby given in relation to the first assessment.

[ 1907 c 153 s 45; RRS s 9260. Prior: 1905 c 55 s 45; 1893 c 84 s 45.]